Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1458
Manufacturer-dealer agreement; change ownership by dealer; notice; procedure.

(1) A dealer shall provide written notice to each manufacturer and distributor with which the manufacturer is currently under a manufacturer-dealer agreement that such dealer intends to change ownership by any manner, including the sale of assets of the dealer and a stock transfer. Such written notice shall be provided at least ten business days before the change of ownership to the headquarters of each such manufacturer and distributor.

(2)(a) Within three business days after receiving a written notice under this section, a manufacturer or distributor may request the dealer to provide any supporting documentation that is required by the manufacturer or distributor to determine if such manufacturer or distributor will object to the change in ownership.

(b) Any such requested supporting documentation shall be provided by the dealer within three business days after receiving the request for such supporting documentation.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 17.
October 1, 2026